North Carolina, session 2025, HB243.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The governing body of a city or county may adopt ordinances
providing that notice of public hearings required under Chapter 160D of the General Statutes
may be given by a joint planning board created pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A
of the General Statutes through electronic means, including, but not limited to, the city's or
county's website. Ordinances adopted pursuant to this act shall not supersede any State law that
requires notice by mail to certain classes of people or the posting of signs on certain property and
shall not alter the publication schedule for any public notice.
SECTION 2. This act applies only to the City of Durham and Durham County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H243-v-1*